Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4806
Fees.

The administrator shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations setting appropriate fee guidelines for the services provided under the Farm Mediation Act, which fees shall not exceed actual costs and shall be borne equally by all parties, and setting forth any procedures or requirements necessary to implement the act. The rules and regulations shall provide that the fees shall be collected by the farm mediation service and retained by the farm mediation service to offset its costs and that the farm mediation service may require payment of the fees or a portion thereof prior to a mediation meeting. The administrator may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that allow a separate fee schedule for mediation services that are not eligible for partial or full federal reimbursement.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB108, § 1.